Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 5. Management.

Sec. 10.50.110.
Management generally.

Except as otherwise provided in the company’s articles of organization, the members of a limited liability company manage the affairs and make the decisions of the company. Management by the members is subject to a provision in an operating agreement or this chapter limiting or increasing the management rights and duties of the members, including limits or increases placed on a class of members or an individual member.

If a limited liability company is managed by a manager, the manager has the exclusive power to manage the affairs of the company to the extent authorized by the operating agreement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.115.
Appointment, removal, and replacement of managers.

Except as otherwise provided in an operating agreement of a limited liability company, a manager of the company may not be appointed, removed, or replaced, unless more than one-half of all of the members of the company authorize the appointment, removal, or replacement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.120.
Eligibility and number of managers.

Unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement of the company, a manager of a limited liability company may be a person who is not an individual or a member of the company. A company may have more than one manager.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.125.
Tenure of manager.

Unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement of the company, a manager of a limited liability company holds office until the manager’s successor is elected and qualified, unless the manager resigns or is removed earlier.

A manager may not resign as manager of a limited liability company except at the time or upon the happening of events specified in the operating agreement of the company. An operating agreement may provide that a manager does not have the right to resign as a manager of a limited liability company. Notwithstanding that an operating agreement provides that a manager does not have the right to resign as a manager of a limited liability company, a manager may resign as a manager of a limited liability company at any time by giving notice to the members and any other managers. If the resignation of a manager violates the operating agreement of the company, in addition to any remedy otherwise available under applicable law, a limited liability company may recover from the resigning manager damages for breach of the operating agreement and may offset the damages against the amount otherwise distributable to the resigning manager. If the manager was the sole manager and if, within 90 days after the resignation, the members fail to agree on the appointment of a new manager, then each member shall have a say in the management of the company that is equal to the proportion of the member’s capital account in the company.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994; am § 2 ch 78 SLA 1997)

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 24(a), ch. 78, SLA 1997, a “limited liability company whose original articles of organization were filed with the department on or after July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997],” and a “limited liability company whose original articles of organization were filed with the department before July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997], if its articles of organization are amended on or after July 1, 1997, to state that the company is to be governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997].” For the text of this section in effect on June 30, 1997, see the 1996 volume for AS 10.

Sec. 10.50.130.
Limitation of member fiduciary duty.

Unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement of the company, if a person is a member of a limited liability company that is managed by a manager and if the person is not a manager, the person does not have the fiduciary duty of a manager to the company or to the other members of the company when the person acts solely in the capacity of a member.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.135.
Duty of care.

A person who is a manager or a managing member of a limited liability company shall perform the duties of management in good faith, in a manner the person reasonably believes to be in the best interests of the company, and with the care, including reasonable inquiry, that an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would use under similar circumstances. Except as provided in (b) of this section, the person is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, in each case prepared or presented by

an employee of the company whom the person reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented; or

counsel, public accountants, or other professionals or experts as to matters that the person reasonably believes to be within the professional’s or expert’s competence.

A person is not acting in good faith under (a) of this section if the person has knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes reliance otherwise permitted by (a) of this section unwarranted.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.140.
Conflicts of interest.

A contract or other transaction between a limited liability company and a manager or managing member of a limited liability company, or between a limited liability company and a limited liability company, foreign limited liability company, corporation, firm, or association in which a manager or managing member of the company has a material financial interest, is not void or voidable because the manager or managing member or the other company, corporation, firm, or association are parties or because the manager or managing member is present at the meeting that authorizes, approves, or ratifies the contract or transaction, if the material facts as to the transaction and as to the interest of the manager or managing member are fully disclosed or known to the members and the contract or transaction is approved by the members in good faith, with the interested manager or managing member not being entitled to vote.

The fact that a manager or managing member of a limited liability company is a manager or managing member of another entity involved in the transaction does not alone constitute a material financial interest within the meaning of this section. A manager or managing member is not interested within the meaning of this section in a decision fixing the compensation of another manager or managing member as a manager or managing member of the company, notwithstanding the fact that the first manager or managing member is also receiving compensation from the company.

A contract or other transaction between a manager or managing member and a limited liability company or association of which one or more managers or managing members of the company are managers or managing members is not void or voidable because the managers or managing members are present at the meeting that authorizes, approves, or ratifies the contract or transaction, if the material facts of the transaction and the manager’s or managing member’s other management position are fully disclosed or known to the members and the members authorize, approve, or ratify the contract or transaction in good faith by a sufficient vote without counting the vote of the common manager or managing member or the contract or transaction is approved by the members in good faith. This subsection does not apply to contracts or transactions covered by (a) of this section.

Nothing in this section affects the prohibitions or restraints imposed by AS

45.50.562

—

45.50.596

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.145.
Loans to managers, managing members, and employees.

A loan may not be extended by a limited liability company to an employee without authorization by the company’s managers or managing members. A loan may not be extended to a manager or a managing member of a limited liability company without the approval of two-thirds of the company’s members. An employee who is also a manager or managing member is considered a manager or managing member for purposes of this section. A member is not disqualified from voting on a loan to a member as a manager or managing member because of personal interest.

A loan to a manager, managing member, or employee and a loan secured by the limited liability company interests of the company may not be made unless the loan would be permissible as a distribution under AS

10.50.290

—

10.50.345

. A loan under this subsection impairs the retained earnings or paid-in capital accounts to the extent of the loan.

For purposes of this section, a loan may consist of cash, securities, or personal or real property.

If a limited liability company acts as a guarantor on a loan to a manager, managing member, or employee, the guarantee is treated as a loan under this section.

A manager, managing member, or employee of an affiliated limited liability company is a manager, managing member, or employee of the lending company for purposes of this section.

A loan is to be judged by the duties of managers and managing members to act in good faith in a manner reasonably believed to be in the best interests of the company and with the care, including reasonable inquiry, that an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would use under similar circumstances.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.148.
Indemnification of managers, managing members, employees, and agents; insurance.

A limited liability company may indemnify a person who was, is, or is threatened to be made a party to a completed, pending, or threatened action or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative, other than an action by or in the right of the company, by reason of the fact that the person is or was a manager, managing member, employee, or agent of the company, or is or was serving at the request of the company as a manager, managing member, employee, or agent of another limited liability company, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise. Indemnification may include reimbursement of expenses, attorney fees, judgments, fines, and amounts paid in settlement actually and reasonably incurred by the person in connection with the action or proceeding if the person acted in good faith and in a manner the person reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the company, and, with respect to a criminal action or proceeding, the person had no reasonable cause to believe the conduct was unlawful. The termination of an action or proceeding by judgment, order, settlement, conviction, or upon a plea of nolo contendere or its equivalent, does not create a presumption that the person did not act in good faith and in a manner which the person reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the company, and, with respect to a criminal action or proceeding, the person had reasonable cause to believe that the conduct was unlawful.

A limited liability company may indemnify a person who was, is, or is threatened to be made a party to a completed, pending, or threatened action by or in the right of the company to procure a judgment in its favor by reason of the fact that the person is or was a manager, managing member, employee, or agent of the company, or is or was serving at the request of the company as a manager, managing member, employee, or agent of another limited liability company, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise. Indemnification may include reimbursement for expenses and attorney fees actually and reasonably incurred by the person in connection with the defense or settlement of the action if the person acted in good faith and in a manner the person reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the company. Indemnification may not be made in respect of any claim, issue, or matter as to which the person has been adjudged to be liable for negligence or misconduct in the performance of the person’s duty to the company except to the extent that the court in which the action was brought determines upon application that, despite the adjudication of liability, in view of all the circumstances of the case, the person is fairly and reasonably entitled to indemnity for expenses that the court considers proper.

To the extent that a manager, managing member, employee, or agent of a limited liability company has been successful on the merits or otherwise in defense of an action or proceeding referred to in (a) or (b) of this section, or in defense of a claim, issue, or matter in the action or proceeding, the manager, managing member, employee, or agent shall be indemnified against expenses and attorney fees actually and reasonably incurred in connection with the defense.

Unless otherwise ordered by a court, indemnification under (a) or (b) of this section may only be made by a company upon a determination that indemnification of the manager, managing member, employee, or agent is proper in the circumstances because the manager, managing member, employee, or agent has met the applicable standard of conduct set out in (a) and (b) of this section. The determination shall be made by the members.

The company may pay or reimburse the reasonable expenses incurred in defending a civil or criminal action or proceeding in advance of the final disposition in the manner provided in (d) of this section if

in the case of a manager or managing member, the manager or managing member furnishes the company with a written affirmation of a good faith belief that the standard of conduct described in AS

10.50.135(a)

has been met;

the manager, managing member, employee, or agent furnishes the company a written unlimited general undertaking, executed personally or on behalf of the individual, to repay the advance if it is ultimately determined that an applicable standard of conduct was not met; and

a determination is made that the facts then known to those making the determination would not preclude indemnification under this chapter.

The indemnification provided by this section is not exclusive of any other rights to which a person seeking indemnification may be entitled. The right to indemnification continues as to a person who has ceased to be a manager, managing member, employee, or agent, and inures to the benefit of the heirs, executors, and administrators of the person.

A limited liability company may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of a person who is or was a manager, managing member, employee, or agent of the company, or is or was serving at the request of the company as a manager, managing member, employee, or agent of another limited liability company, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise against any liability asserted against the person and incurred by the person in that capacity, or arising out of that status, whether or not the company has the power to indemnify the person against the liability under the provisions of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.150.
Authorization of company affairs.

Unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement of the company, the company’s articles of organization, or by this chapter, if the company is not managed by a manager, the consent of more than one-half of all of the members of a limited liability company is required to decide the affairs of the company.

Unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement of the company or by this chapter, the consent of more than one-half of the number of managers of a limited liability company is required to decide the affairs of the company.

Notwithstanding (a) and (b) of this section, and unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement of the company or in the company’s articles of organization, the written consent of all of the members of a limited liability company is required to

amend the articles of organization;

amend an operating agreement of the company; or

authorize a manager or member to perform an act on behalf of the company that contravenes an operating agreement of the company, including an act that contravenes a provision of the operating agreement that expressly limits the purposes, affairs, or conduct of the affairs of the company.

[Repealed, § 4 ch 52 SLA 2007.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994; am § 3 ch 78 SLA 1997; am §§ 2, 4 ch 52 SLA 2007)

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 24(a), ch. 78, SLA 1997, a “limited liability company whose original articles of organization were filed with the department on or after July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997],” and a “limited liability company whose original articles of organization were filed with the department before July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997], if its articles of organization are amended on or after July 1, 1997, to state that the company is to be governed by AS 10.50, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997].” For the text of this section in effect on June 30, 1997, see the 1996 volume for AS 10.